Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,119
Commission; meetings; records; notice.

The commission shall meet at such times and places as shall be determined by the commission and shall keep a record of its proceedings. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson. Such special meetings shall be called by such chairperson upon receipt of a written request signed by three or more members of the commission. Written notice of the time and place of all meetings shall be mailed in advance to each member of the commission by the secretary.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 119.